Wisconsin, session 2025, AB388.
do enact as follows:AB388,1Section 1. 20.005 (3) (schedule) of the statutes: at the appropriate place, insert the following amounts for the purposes indicated: - See PDF for table AB388,2Section 2. 20.435 (5) (bk) of the statutes is created to read:20.435 (5) (bk) Integrated mental health facility grant program. Biennially, the amounts in the schedule for an integrated mental health facility grant under 2025 Wisconsin Act .... (this act), section 4 (1).AB388,3Section 3. 20.435 (5) (bk) of the statutes, as created by 2025 Wisconsin Act .... (this act), is repealed.AB388,4Section 4. Nonstatutory provisions.(1) Integrated mental health facility grant program.(a) In fiscal biennium 2025-27, the department of health services shall, subject to pars. (b) and (c), award a onetime grant to Rogers Behavioral Health to construct and build an integrated mental health facility in the Chippewa Valley region of this state that provides outpatient, intensive outpatient, partial hospitalization, residential, and inpatient levels of care to adolescents and adults with a full continuum of care for mental health issues.(b) Rogers Behavioral Health shall submit to the department of health services a letter of intent that includes all of the following regarding the facility described under par. (a):1. A statement that, for inpatient services at the facility, Rogers Behavioral Health will apply for certifications under chs. DHS 61, 75, and 124, Wis. Adm. Code, to the extent such certifications are required by law to provide inpatient hospital mental health services to adults and minors.2. A statement that, for residential services at the facility, Rogers Behavioral Health will apply for certifications under chs. DHS 75 and 83, Wis. Adm. Code, and ch. DCF 52, Wis. Adm. Code, to the extent such certifications are required by law to provide residential mental health services to adults and minors.3. A statement that, for partial hospitalization services at the facility, Rogers Behavioral Health will apply for certifications under chs. DHS 35, 40, 61, and 75, Wis. Adm. Code, to the extent such certifications are required by law to provide mental health partial hospitalization services to adults and minors.4. A statement that, for intensive outpatient services at the facility, Rogers Behavioral health will apply for certifications under chs. DHS 35, 40, 61, and 75, Wis. Adm. Code, to the extent such certifications are required by law to provide mental health intensive outpatient services to adults and minors.5. A statement that, for outpatient services at the facility, Rogers Behavioral Health will apply for certifications under chs. DHS 35 and 75, Wis. Adm. Code, to the extent such certifications are required by law to provide mental health outpatient services to adults and minors.6. A statement that the inpatient unit described in subd. 1. will admit involuntary patients to the inpatient unit under s. 51.15 within 2 years of accepting patients at the facility.7. A statement that the facility will accept patients who are Medical Assistance recipients and a projected payer mix and projected Medical Assistance recipient census for each service line described in subds. 1. to 5.8. Rogers Behavioral Health’s plan for providing services to Medical Assistance recipients at the facility, which reflects the Medical Assistance population in the Chippewa Valley region of the state.9. A projected timeline for when each service line described in subds. 1. to 5. will be open to receive patients.(c) If Rogers Behavioral Health submits proof of purchase or lease of land and the letter of intent submitted under par. (b) includes all of the information required by par. (b), the department of health services shall approve the letter of intent and award the grant under par. (a).(d) Beginning within one year after the effective date of this paragraph, and annually for an additional 4 years thereafter, Rogers Behavioral Health shall submit to the department of health services a report regarding the facility described under par. (a), including updates on the information required in the letter of intent as outlined in par. (b) 1. to 9.AB388,5Section 5. Effective dates. This act takes effect on the day after publication, except as follows:(1) The repeal of s. 20.435 (5) (bk) takes effect on July 1, 2027. Down Down /2025/related/enrolled/ab388 true enrolledbills /2025/related/enrolled/ab388 enrolledbills/2025/REG/AB388 enrolledbills/2025/REG/AB388 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Enrolled Legislation»AB388: Text as Enrolled × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting